lib/dict/hyph_lv_LV.dic
ISO8859-13
d4z
d4þ
a2i
a2u
i2e
e2i
u2i
i2u
o2i
o2u
e2u
.vi1s2a.
.vi1s2â.
.vi1s2i.
.vi1s2os.
.vi1s2u.
.vi1s2iem.
o1pî
û1rç
i1ta
û1ga
ç1þu
û1to
â1ni
i1rç
i1èo
â1bu
o1mî
o1kâ
o1èi
â1lo
e1èû
o1ïâ
e1la
i1ðo
o1bi
ç1cç
â1ru
o1si
u1no
e1hâ
â1nç
e1bû
i1ru
o1sû
a1èa
â1èa
o1rç
i1ke
o1ra
u1te
i1zo
i1gi
ç1ma
û1íe
û1ca
o1dç
a1nâ
â1ge
e1èi
û1bç
ç1tâ
â1fi
i1zi
o1lî
e1ðe
e1gâ
i1fo
a1òo
u1to
î1zç
û1gu
â1ða
i1íi
û1nç
î1ma
â1te
ç1kç
û1mâ
u1zu
o1sâ
ç1bu
î1ga
e1di
î1te
a1ïî
e1tç
i1þe
o1fo
â1pu
o1hu
ç1do
o1du
â1ma
û1mi
e1re
i1ha
i1be
e1lu
â1ja
û1ta
a1ðû
a1da
ç1cî
i1bu
a1pî
u1òâ
e1zu
û1no
e1nî
i1no
e1mâ
ç1ïa
û1pâ
â1be
â1mo
î1ja
e1ji
î1re
e1ce
î1ri
î1tî
û1ni
î1þî
i1þi
a1fî
a1be
e1ðâ
e1ío
e1pû
e1ïî
u1ìi
ç1tî
a1ci
e1jç
a1zî
o1lç
u1ga
î1ci
a1ke
e1ho
i1nû
û1ðî
e1si
e1bo
o1ìç
u1òi
u1sç
ç1bâ
o1ða
û1ro
ç1ce
i1zî
i1ve
o1ïu
i1dî
o1ku
e1vç
a1ri
u1sâ
i1pâ
i1dç
o1pû
î1vî
a1me
ç1ze
î1bç
u1íe
a1bç
a1ja
â1ïo
a1jç
e1fe
o1pu
o1to
ç1vç
a1ki
o1mâ
o1lo
a1lo
ç1íi
e1ðç
û1dî
û1câ
o1zo
o1gû
o1gâ
î1tç
e1zç
î1le
e1gî
î1na
o1me
e1po
e1fu
a1ìe
u1rû
u1ri
û1jo
e1dç
a1ïa
a1þâ
î1ïa
ç1ne
a1zû
â1vç
e1so
o1mi
o1ðo
ç1sî
ç1ïu
e1ga
i1pç
e1vu
o1ru
ç1ju
u1èi
â1va
a1hu
î1sç
e1ía
i1râ
a1èâ
î1ki
i1ti
u1cu
i1þu
â1jo
u1ki
u1mu
o1íî
e1ma
î1ïo
ç1de
o1èo
â1èu
i1òa
u1ïa
u1mâ
o1he
i1lî
a1de
o1fa
ç1ro
o1sî
â1ri
û1ti
o1bç
a1jâ
û1zu
â1vî
e1ïe
o1òa
î1de
î1ðe
a1kû
û1ja
o1dî
e1þi
e1ri
î1gâ
e1ki
u1ze
u1ma
i1vî
ç1pî
u1lu
e1ti
o1èâ
a1íi
û1zç
a1ïo
i1èi
o1ke
a1ìu
i1vç
u1èu
u1ca
u1vu
o1ïa
i1ri
o1òo
u1co
a1râ
o1jâ
î1bi
e1èî
ç1rç
e1kâ
i1pi
a1ka
â1vu
û1þa
e1mî
e1vî
o1gi
a1pç
û1zâ
i1cç
e1va
o1nî
î1ru
e1pâ
a1ce
ç1kâ
o1ja
a1hç
a1bo
û1mu
î1ve
i1nâ
i1fi
o1va
u1þu
e1ìi
ç1nî
i1li
i1òo
u1la
î1ìe
e1ca
a1tâ
û1zi
a1bû
ç1pç
î1su
î1pâ
î1zu
û1di
e1lo
â1mâ
e1ci
a1þa
ç1to
e1rû
â1la
u1íu
o1ìî
â1pa
e1lû
e1sî
e1bç
i1co
i1íç
a1ðo
û1ku
u1ðâ
o1di
a1òa
î1pa
o1pi
a1þç
a1si
a1ha
u1ðo
ç1mâ
î1mo
â1þo
û1lu
e1þû
o1íi
â1vâ
a1þo
i1zâ
a1ku
o1zi
o1dâ
e1cu
î1no
e1zi
e1jû
â1òo
i1ce
û1lç
a1þî
o1mç
i1bî
o1re
e1zû
û1ra
a1gi
i1lç
î1bâ
û1ðu
e1bi
i1gû
û1íi
ç1va
â1to
u1ce
a1pû
â1gi
i1íe
â1kâ
e1íî
ç1þa
u1ve
u1vo
ç1no
o1bu
a1tî
e1fi
e1ïo
û1þi
a1tû
î1ti
î1la
i1ho
ç1gi
i1fû
a1tç
â1íi
a1mi
e1ra
u1ja
e1me
î1bu
i1pu
o1la
a1íî
u1ðu
o1þa
a1rû
û1ïa
e1èu
î1lo
o1nu
â1jç
a1dâ
u1rç
u1rî
ç1þo
i1mâ
a1zo
o1þu
ç1da
î1co
û1zî
â1sa
ç1ðu
û1po
i1si
u1zç
û1ri
u1zî
û1gâ
e1pu
â1du
e1cç
ç1ji
i1bi
ç1râ
i1ïi
u1nu
i1ki
a1mû
î1ni
â1fe
ç1ca
â1òi
u1go
a1nu
e1nç
u1ku
â1þi
ç1go
e1èe
ç1za
â1èâ
i1ìe
î1go
a1go
e1bî
i1ze
e1ðû
o1kç
o1pç
i1na
â1ra
â1jî
o1za
e1zâ
a1lâ
e1òç
a1je
ç1si
â1bo
u1gâ
i1sç
u1ði
u1bî
a1vâ
e1ko
â1ðu
â1ìç
i1mo
e1ïâ
i1tç
u1ïâ
a1òç
u1na
î1vo
û1me
a1hî
û1ka
â1mî
â1lî
û1tu
e1je
î1vâ
a1ba
î1dâ
û1ko
û1cç
â1nî
a1ïç
u1ju
â1þâ
û1mo
i1ge
â1pâ
e1lâ
i1íî
a1sç
e1ni
a1ma
a1tu
i1kû
a1bi
i1jî
î1íu
e1fâ
u1ta
ç1dç
a1gâ
i1lâ
i1òi
e1ïa
ç1ti
â1bi
a1ði
a1lî
i1ja
e1mu
o1hç
u1jâ
û1ða
i1sâ
u1po
â1câ
a1se
o1òe
u1fo
â1sû
â1bû
o1co
o1íç
â1ïa
e1þe
u1tî
î1ku
u1ía
u1zi
e1do
i1so
o1fi
ç1sâ
i1pî
î1ði
a1dî
â1ti
u1òo
u1pa
o1ka
o1cî
i1pe
î1mâ
â1pç
â1pî
û1pç
o1bû
e1íç
a1mç
â1rû
o1de
i1ía
o1ðî
î1gu
u1bi
â1ka
â1nu
u1þi
u1so
ç1ka
â1le
ç1pe
u1ïî
î1me
u1dî
i1þâ
i1du
ç1ra
o1vo
o1fâ
o1so
â1ïâ
e1dâ
â1gu
o1bo
e1hî
â1ìi
â1èo
a1dç
u1di
î1se
ç1sç
â1nâ
a1nî
û1râ
o1hi
o1ðâ
i1lû
ç1lç
i1te
u1ðe
î1tu
u1ìo
e1ði
û1ba
e1òa
u1si
ç1zo
û1kâ
i1gu
û1da
i1sû
o1bî
a1mo
ç1gâ
â1ve
u1bç
e1òo
ç1vo
î1mî
u1ïu
â1tu
i1cî
u1fa
â1tâ
ç1gu
o1ga
i1mi
i1fç
i1ïe
â1co
u1þî
i1zç
i1vu
a1ju
i1ca
î1èu
û1re
ç1bi
e1ro
i1fâ
a1he
u1mo
i1jo
e1bu
î1ro
a1te
î1ìi
â1di
i1bû
u1ïi
u1le
a1na
e1tâ
e1bâ
o1tû
û1ze
â1fu
î1be
a1pâ
u1de
i1dû
e1ve
î1di
a1vo
u1lâ
e1pi
u1dç
ç1dâ
o1jo
i1þo
î1íe
o1nâ
e1mû
â1zâ
a1ro
î1râ
a1þe
u1je
a1ti
û1cî
i1tî
î1vi
î1jo
e1co
i1tû
i1bo
û1pe
e1tû
o1pâ
ç1se
a1ïâ
â1ji
a1èo
e1za
â1mç
a1þû
e1ðo
î1ïu
û1jâ
o1su
e1ja
o1ta
e1lî
o1ze
î1vç
o1vâ
a1vî
i1kî
â1zî
u1ha
î1pç
i1de
o1nç
û1bî
ç1tu
a1þi
â1þu
o1òâ
o1ïo
i1òç
u1ci
î1ca
û1sa
e1rî
i1bç
e1ne
a1ðî
u1gi
î1mu
a1zâ
i1lo
î1cç
u1lî
e1èo
a1bu
i1nî
â1dâ
â1tç
â1ko
î1ðu
o1ìi
a1ta
i1la
a1va
a1ðe
a1hi
a1ca
e1be
e1þç
a1su
î1dî
o1da
e1ìo
e1òu
e1pa
î1jâ
e1sâ
a1òi
û1so
î1nu
i1vo
û1lo
î1nç
ç1mî
û1cu
o1þç
ç1jâ
î1câ
a1èu
o1zû
a1lu
â1lu
o1òu
a1vu
i1tu
i1íu
i1ío
i1ko
a1fa
î1pi
i1go
i1me
a1fi
e1sû
î1ju
o1pe
a1sî
a1nç
û1þe
ç1ve
i1po
o1zç
a1ne
e1sa
a1lç
ç1ða
û1gi
ç1lâ
i1mû
u1vâ
û1mî
û1mç
u1ro
â1po
o1ju
i1fu
i1jç
i1ga
û1tâ
ç1lu
û1sâ
a1gû
â1bâ
a1la
o1ri
ç1ðo
û1òa
o1fç
e1li
ç1ko
u1va
î1ðo
a1zi
e1dî
i1da
i1ðî
i1hî
i1ne
i1ðu
ç1ku
e1òâ
o1na
î1þa
o1èa
â1fa
o1tç
î1dç
o1tâ
i1hi
ç1mu
î1so
e1câ
â1zi
î1cî
u1ðç
o1no
â1òe
u1bu
û1gç
o1ve
a1ìî
i1lu
i1pa
e1ka
â1ci
u1íî
o1sa
o1go
i1nu
î1þo
i1sî
o1fî
a1pu
a1du
î1ïi
o1ba
i1fa
e1mi
o1cu
u1þa
â1mi
a1íâ
i1èu
o1þû
î1kâ
â1íe
u1ìç
e1da
ç1dî
î1èo
û1pa
â1de
o1ma
i1dâ
ç1òo
û1þu
o1ko
a1vç
â1zç
â1sâ
î1do
u1câ
î1ïâ
u1du
e1ju
â1si
o1vç
i1ða
u1fe
o1ji
ç1re
û1ïî
u1òa
â1ca
a1ðu
û1nu
û1le
e1íi
â1tî
o1ge
i1vâ
û1za
ç1nâ
û1ma
â1íu
e1lç
â1sç
â1li
î1ne
i1mî
â1pi
a1mâ
a1þu
i1ju
ç1vu
u1nâ
û1ru
e1vi
a1pa
i1bâ
o1cç
â1lç
e1ku
u1lç
i1se
e1vâ
ç1jç
e1pî
ç1ci
o1ði
a1hâ
a1kâ
u1ji
û1rî
î1sâ
i1ro
o1râ
û1ki
o1ro
e1ru
o1kû
ç1su
a1òâ
û1tî
â1ba
e1òe
e1nu
ç1te
â1vo
a1sa
e1nû
û1þî
o1þe
û1do
ç1jî
î1vu
o1vi
u1ba
â1na
î1mç
a1ji
u1ti
e1mo
a1ra
e1hi
o1te
u1bo
e1su
i1fî
ç1pi
i1ìi
î1òu
û1lî
â1ro
o1zâ
a1vi
o1ni
î1za
o1do
î1zâ
o1gç
u1zû
u1li
u1da
a1èi
e1ta
i1ra
â1ía
a1jû
î1ba
a1cç
u1ra
i1kâ
i1zu
ç1nu
a1ðâ
e1to
u1gç
û1pî
a1ho
â1je
î1ía
a1ve
o1ðu
u1èo
î1mi
u1sî
a1dû
e1cû
î1rî
u1ko
â1íî
â1zu
â1mu
î1sa
â1òu
u1ka
i1ba
û1vi
ç1ga
ç1ìe
a1rî
u1ða
u1cî
a1co
î1cu
o1vu
i1je
u1do
o1câ
â1vi
i1jâ
a1ze
a1mu
o1òi
e1þa
o1èî
i1èa
i1mç
â1cî
ç1la
e1dû
û1nî
î1po
ç1ïi
î1nâ
û1be
u1se
û1ci
î1òâ
î1ke
â1cç
ç1sa
ç1li
a1ìâ
u1pe
â1ku
a1bî
u1pu
o1ca
u1ne
î1ïî
u1mi
e1du
i1ïu
u1pâ
î1òa
î1pu
u1be
o1èu
o1ðç
û1ðo
ç1me
a1ía
u1zo
ç1zâ
û1ce
e1tî
o1íu
ç1jo
u1tû
â1cu
i1vi
e1þâ
a1jo
e1jo
û1bi
u1nî
â1ïu
e1zo
i1ma
u1vç
o1jû
o1ha
û1pu
e1ða
a1ru
a1li
u1mî
û1ve
â1pe
i1cu
û1nâ
î1sî
e1pe
î1zî
i1rî
î1pe
o1po
â1rç
a1òe
î1gi
e1þî
î1lu
i1su
î1tâ
a1no
î1þi
a1sû
a1ko
i1þç
u1jo
i1va
î1ji
a1fe
o1pa
e1rç
e1ðî
ç1cu
i1ðâ
û1þâ
e1ìe
ç1câ
a1po
i1tâ
â1ne
î1va
e1se
î1ra
o1gu
û1de
u1dâ
i1di
u1râ
ç1nç
a1to
e1fî
a1so
e1ze
ç1le
o1mu
î1ta
e1ïu
a1zç
ç1íç
o1ìe
e1na
û1vç
ç1du
u1þo
i1nç
î1si
i1ka
î1fe
e1no
i1le
e1pç
e1ìç
â1go
i1ni
e1èa
a1èî
ç1be
a1ða
e1gi
i1mu
ç1bç
a1èû
î1ðâ
a1bâ
î1du
o1ci
ç1bo
â1ki
o1mo
ç1lo
o1lâ
o1le
a1gî
u1kâ
ç1vi
î1lç
u1èç
ç1mo
a1cî
u1èa
î1to
a1fç
u1íi
e1fa
î1ða
o1bâ
a1ïi
î1da
a1mî
i1gâ
a1ìç
e1cî
â1ta
i1re
â1me
û1dç
a1re
î1li
a1ga
o1tu
u1pî
e1ha
â1íç
e1tu
i1ìç
e1kç
â1bç
o1èû
a1zu
û1sç
û1ne
â1ga
û1vo
o1ho
ç1ïâ
o1rî
û1ju
o1fu
û1ji
o1lû
â1do
i1to
u1bâ
u1ge
u1cç
a1le
u1íç
î1ce
a1íu
â1ze
e1ðu
ç1ja
a1vû
i1òâ
ç1na
o1ne
â1dç
â1ìa
u1su
u1sa
ç1di
û1su
e1fo
ç1ni
î1pî
i1ku
ç1pa
ç1po
î1zi
i1ïa
i1ði
ç1lî
â1no
a1jî
â1gâ
o1zî
â1dî
o1ïi
â1râ
ç1zi
û1pi
ç1ge
o1mû
i1kç
e1gû
u1gu
i1zû
a1gu
a1lû
i1câ
û1lâ
o1íe
o1se
ç1vâ
ç1ru
a1fo
e1sç
â1re
â1lâ
e1ïi
a1òu
e1jâ
â1þa
ç1zu
e1òi
u1pi
ç1mç
o1òç
o1ti
u1pç
e1zî
u1fi
e1íe
â1jâ
u1vî
î1òi
u1þâ
û1li
e1de
o1be
ç1zî
e1hu
e1he
î1lâ
u1tç
e1nâ
a1sâ
â1se
ç1ïo
a1ìi
î1ze
o1je
û1te
e1kû
o1li
â1ce
o1vî
i1ci
â1so
e1ge
i1ðe
a1ni
i1do
â1lû
o1þâ
o1ðe
o1zu
a1cu
e1mç
e1gu
ç1ta
a1do
e1ba
ç1ìi
e1þo
â1gû
a1za
û1la
û1íî
a1pi
î1nî
û1ðâ
i1ðç
o1ïe
ç1mi
u1zâ
i1íâ
î1ko
o1dû
î1íi
a1íç
â1su
î1lî
e1èâ
ç1ïe
u1za
o1þi
o1fe
û1tç
o1ki
â1za
e1le
ç1bî
a1di
o1sç
î1þu
î1bo
u1me
a1rç
i1ïo
û1si
â1sî
u1ni
î1ka
â1ïi
o1tî
â1ðo
u1tu
e1þu
i1þa
o1lu
ç1rî
â1ju
u1ðî
a1íe
ç1so
â1da
ç1ba
ç1ri
o1ce
ç1ki
i1ïâ
a1pe
o1ðû
u1ïo
î1zo
ç1rû
e1go
e1te
i1za
e1vo
u1vi
i1fe
i1òu
â1zo
ç1zç
o1jç
u1re
â1òa
ç1pâ
o1þo
u1nç
u1òu
û1du
a1ïu
u1mç
ç1pu
u1lo
i1ji
â1rî
î1rç
e1râ
u1ru
a1câ
o1rû
û1na
u1ìe
û1dâ
u1tâ
i1sa
at1tu
eg1rû
ak1so
it1de
eb1lâ
et1vî
or1bi
al1ða
ap1dû
ak1na
um1ci
að1le
çr1íe
en1ku
il1ki
çr1ku
at1nâ
at1ìç
us1pç
os1vî
os1ci
an1ra
en1pa
ej1dç
aþ1vî
as1bu
îs1ga
iò1di
en1to
uj1me
or1ki
el1zo
ot1nç
es1ko
uz1gu
ak1ti
îr1ni
iz1hi
il1pu
es1ma
ât1vi
ag1rç
on1zç
îb1tu
ap1do
ît1vî
ul1sâ
îk1lî
ur1so
ok1tç
çb1tu
îs1la
et1ve
al1mo
op1ða
en1ce
im1nî
uð1ía
ek1ti
iz1cî
er1di
ur1fa
an1tâ
er1ba
as1pe
al1su
ip1so
al1cî
at1de
aò1ra
çk1ðu
îg1li
om1ni
oò1ka
as1le
at1òi
id1rî
un1ve
al1kû
in1da
âr1ba
îs1þu
al1ka
up1jî
ur1gu
at1sî
îg1mâ
âl1ti
al1va
uï1ku
ok1rç
er1gi
uz1ïo
ak1ðç
îm1re
iz1te
ât1vç
çg1ni
îg1ru
il1cç
ir1mu
ar1ku
ot1zi
ub1na
an1èe
om1bî
çg1si
el1le
av1ru
il1nu
çs1te
ur1kâ
ik1ro
ep1nu
ur1vç
oò1lu
it1ma
il1ja
çj1tç
an1ga
eð1pa
âl1ce
ob1rî
ur1vi
up1ri
çz1tâ
iz1èo
ap1ða
uz1ru
ut1rç
ar1to
eþ1nî
að1ïu
aï1ce
al1ne
is1sî
ib1ðo
uz1nu
ut1òu
ul1de
âr1ho
am1pû
çl1gu
um1vi
ik1to
çr1ze
oþ1va
ez1nî
am1lî
ak1se
el1ko
ep1si
âj1tu
um1zâ
at1ja
al1íî
az1dâ
or1to
ec1he
at1cî
en1ko
ûs1ki
îg1sa
ef1ri
âr1sa
im1po
ît1rî
ed1vi
id1sç
â1dþâ
up1la
çc1te
es1pu
uk1ðo
âp1ni
â1dþi
ak1la
en1na
as1ka
âm1di
ag1li
og1râ
ag1dâ
oz1vi
an1ku
îk1nç
us1mû
er1ma
âb1ða
in1tu
ob1ti
ap1cu
es1vâ
ac1ti
ur1pu
ar1kî
el1la
it1ta
am1le
ik1se
çk1ti
ar1sa
is1mu
ut1íe
âr1vî
u1dþi
et1nâ
id1ka
âl1se
ur1na
âr1zo
uz1li
ân1ka
as1ve
ab1la
aò1íe
çb1tâ
el1vâ
al1þu
at1pû
at1go
çr1la
e1dzi
iz1dç
ab1se
at1þç
ir1ca
çr1su
uï1ma
el1pe
ej1ve
ap1ve
îg1râ
el1po
ed1lo
it1mo
ep1nâ
uk1tu
at1ðo
ap1ðâ
âr1èo
ak1sç
ek1tç
om1pe
ul1go
um1dî
ec1si
çd1vi
um1mâ
iz1mo
ok1zâ
âp1ro
âl1ko
âl1vç
ed1po
îl1zi
of1rç
çj1lo
ap1sû
ip1ðo
is1pu
in1fe
ep1ra
at1ða
or1ga
on1gâ
ak1ðu
at1jo
es1pa
uz1ða
âr1su
uz1be
ik1sî
en1ða
ok1te
ok1bu
ur1ða
or1ìe
în1ta
ap1ìi
iz1zu
im1tî
ap1te
on1nâ
us1jû
ur1no
ab1ti
en1jû
op1so
eò1no
ur1ka
an1ðo
ol1le
ûs1mo
âs1tâ
ek1tî
uz1sî
ið1íâ
um1pâ
is1po
ob1lç
ap1za
ek1do
ez1mç
çd1la
uð1ka
of1ri
en1hî
âf1ri
uk1nu
iz1do
ej1ga
ul1ri
iz1fi
ir1na
is1ka
âr1do
en1ðo
oþ1ma
çs1tî
at1sâ
um1la
oð1pa
eb1to
ez1òi
ej1ka
iv1þu
uò1ìu
ik1na
il1ko
ol1mu
im1si
ap1ta
os1tu
us1tî
at1ko
ar1ci
iï1do
un1èi
oð1si
en1zâ
ir1zo
i1dþâ
uz1ba
er1vç
ip1ni
il1zu
in1pû
or1hi
iv1de
os1mç
uz1pû
âm1pi
os1tû
az1bç
al1de
on1de
uz1ce
em1ba
çr1ïu
at1nç
âr1tû
ur1cu
ir1ku
âv1da
îp1ri
op1râ
ej1ni
am1dî
ak1va
ek1pi
up1ve
ût1ma
un1tâ
að1ma
âv1ja
um1ti
ûz1mâ
im1te
ev1rç
on1ti
ig1za
iz1gû
up1râ
id1pû
âr1cî
âr1lî
el1lç
us1ga
ez1da
ap1cç
ej1la
ag1da
uz1va
op1sç
âì1ve
el1to
çz1kû
eð1vi
uz1vî
î1dze
is1mç
ef1rî
ab1ða
up1ma
âr1nî
að1va
ab1ri
ob1tâ
ik1sâ
is1mî
ag1ða
ûr1ka
âò1mu
ev1ni
or1da
em1ze
âj1lo
at1rû
al1re
il1cî
âr1mi
et1ma
um1da
ob1le
âp1tu
el1pâ
iz1íe
ez1tu
al1tî
ap1rû
iz1ta
em1þa
ar1gi
çv1re
as1kâ
aþ1kâ
eg1ta
al1gâ
ap1le
ap1ro
îv1ni
op1ka
ik1vi
il1tî
ur1pî
ir1kî
iò1ne
iz1da
op1re
çl1ni
is1nu
ar1cç
ed1sç
ul1ka
âs1ma
op1ba
os1fç
ak1le
eï1mû
çb1ðu
að1ra
uï1pu
oí1vâ
âr1ðo
am1di
âr1þu
ed1pu
ed1ve
en1re
ûk1li
uð1pi
ep1ta
al1ve
ad1ma
ez1ce
çg1tâ
ud1rî
im1bi
ek1ra
iv1jû
ez1bi
iz1me
uï1tî
if1rç
ap1ku
id1ni
og1rç
çj1de
op1ko
iz1tî
un1ci
ît1ka
çj1nî
çr1pç
oð1ïa
at1zu
îv1ga
os1na
og1ga
es1lu
ât1ko
az1va
em1zi
as1ke
an1si
iz1mi
er1vâ
ep1sç
al1sâ
us1cû
ul1sa
en1ta
or1vç
ek1tâ
uz1þo
an1ma
i1dzî
ij1ku
id1la
çp1ta
çï1ko
ur1ti
ap1nî
ot1re
eð1òu
un1de
âr1vç
uz1ìî
er1mû
o1dþu
oð1ni
ij1kâ
al1lo
ig1lo
er1rî
em1pu
ug1ïo
ûð1do
ip1ða
ûs1tâ
oð1ba
al1lç
eð1da
uï1ïâ
âr1sû
in1de
em1to
âs1tu
ol1fi
or1mâ
iv1pu
að1la
ec1ho
âr1za
ar1ka
ub1sî
ap1zi
çp1to
âk1tu
er1te
ur1zu
îm1ka
on1ju
ap1go
us1lo
or1na
og1no
am1dâ
âr1ta
çl1ne
er1câ
im1na
uz1zâ
âr1no
aj1ci
ip1tâ
it1ïu
ag1ri
âr1bû
os1po
çò1da
an1kû
om1bç
âr1ve
aï1ìe
im1ti
al1ti
îò1ni
in1na
ep1la
uz1di
iþ1me
al1tç
in1si
ed1ma
or1tu
em1ta
ug1si
er1be
us1ra
il1mu
âr1ga
eb1lo
îr1rû
ît1re
al1la
et1vi
el1di
âr1þi
iz1ca
ad1da
çn1mî
ut1sa
ol1po
ez1ra
ir1ðâ
eg1ðo
ud1pu
ud1lç
uk1sç
on1vu
em1pâ
çk1bç
âr1dç
en1zû
âj1re
at1lo
ez1ni
et1ka
iv1ji
in1ku
or1bî
ok1ti
al1si
ur1zî
ûn1ga
çr1pa
am1bi
at1ro
çr1bu
iz1íç
ip1sç
uz1èi
ir1du
uh1tâ
er1bâ
ik1ga
îð1íi
iz1rû
it1da
ok1òu
çg1ta
ir1lo
an1ka
in1dî
es1vî
op1ma
um1sî
on1pa
em1pî
ûk1ko
el1tî
uz1me
er1vî
ûz1na
eg1ru
it1ga
us1du
ît1òu
ep1lâ
ur1va
um1zî
îd1lî
o1dþi
âr1bu
ak1tâ
er1ta
çr1no
çr1pâ
um1bi
en1ca
oò1cû
çj1mu
at1pî
çr1gâ
ip1re
âr1vi
aï1ío
et1ni
ir1gû
âp1ne
ir1su
ât1me
eb1tu
in1cç
að1íe
ip1ro
om1da
ep1tî
ef1ra
û1dza
çt1ku
ub1li
az1be
ûs1ka
us1pa
ar1su
uf1li
ûr1vî
îs1za
af1rç
uz1òa
e1dþa
iz1bç
ût1di
en1nî
eï1íç
es1ku
az1da
îg1ra
iz1gâ
ar1íî
er1ðu
ud1ka
ed1ri
op1ra
ap1li
ap1dî
ed1la
an1rî
en1tî
âb1ðo
an1cû
çj1da
es1tî
er1ko
ûg1ta
el1zu
in1ne
er1bi
ig1me
eþ1ni
ad1mi
aj1ni
el1li
ik1ðu
âl1pu
ar1ga
et1ta
îc1ðe
uz1zu
om1bû
un1ku
îb1ni
ar1þa
çt1ni
is1tu
un1ze
að1di
it1ni
